Oklahoma, session 2025, SB63.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 5-118, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 5-118. Regular meetings of the board of education of
each school district shall be held upon the first Monday of each
month, or upon such day as may be fixed by the board. Special
meetings may be held from time to time as circumstances may demand.
All meetings of the boards of education shall be public
meetings, and in all such meetings the vote of each member must
shall be publicly cast and recorded. Executive sessions will shall
be permitted only for the purpose of discussing the employment,
hiring, appointment, promotion, demotion, disciplining, or
resignations of any or all of the employees or volunteers of the
school district, and for the purpose of discussing negotiations
concerning employees and representatives of employee groups, and for
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB63 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the purpose of hearing evidence and discussing the expulsion or
suspension of a student or students only when requested by the
student involved or his or her parent, attorney, or legal guardian;
provided, however, that any vote or action thereon must shall be
taken in a public meeting with the vote of each member publicly cast
and recorded. It is required that the The board of education shall
provide notice to the student, his or her parent, attorney, or legal
guardian that said the student is entitled to an executive session
regarding the discussion of his or her expulsion or suspension of
said student.
Any action taken in violation of the provisions of this act
Section 5-101 et seq. of this title shall be invalid.
Each member of the board of education of a school district with
an average daily attendance exceeding fifteen thousand (15,000) or a
school district where boundaries encompass a total population
exceeding one hundred thousand (100,000) persons according to the
last preceding Federal Decennial Census may be paid from the
district’s general fund a stipend of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00)
One Hundred Ninety Dollars ($190.00) for each regular, special, or
adjourned meeting of the board of education that he or she attends,
but not for more than four meetings in any calendar month.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION
February 19, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB63 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)